Massachusetts, session 194th, H3370.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the division of highways, as
established by Section 37 of Chapter 6C of the General Laws, is hereby directed to amend its
standard specifications, supplemental specifications, special provisions, and contract documents
to provide for a minimum of 15 percent for overhead for work deemed to be additional work or
extra work.
of 1